src/morphology/incoming/kawe-verb-suff.lexc
!!
!! Verbal suffixes


LEXICON VerbSuffixes
AspectualSuff;


LEXICON AspectualSuff
CommandAspect     ;
HabitualAspect    ;
PerfectiveAspect     ;
PunctualAspect    ;

LEXICON CommandAspect
<0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@">  Command;

LEXICON Command
+Command:0 #;

LEXICON HabitualAspect
<0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@">  Habitual;

LEXICON Habitual
< %+Habitual:s "@R.CC.One@" > #;
< %+Habitual:{'s} "@R.CC.Two@" > #;
< %+Habitual:{ha} "@R.CC.Four@" > #;
< %+Habitual:{s} "@R.CC.Eight@" > #;


LEXICON PerfectiveAspect
<0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@">  Perfect;

LEXICON Perfect
< %+Perf:0 "@R.CC.One@" > #;
< %+Perf:{'on} "@R.CC.Two@" > #;
< %+Perf:{e} "@R.CC.Four@" > #;
< %+Perf:{on} "@R.CC.Eight@" > #;


LEXICON PunctualAspect
<0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@">  Punctual;

LEXICON Punctual
< %+Punct:{'} "@R.CC.One@" > #;
< %+Punct:{'} "@R.CC.Two@" > #;
< %+Punct:{en'} "@R.CC.Four@" > #;
< %+Punct:{e'} "@R.CC.Eight@" > #;

LEXICON EndAspect
#;
